North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-25.1 Child Abuse and Neglect

50-25.1-01.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to protect the health and welfare of children by encouraging the reporting of children who are known to be or suspected of being abused or neglected; the providing of adequate services for the protection and treatment of abused and neglected children and to protect them from further harm; the identifying of the cause of children’s deaths, when possible; the identifying of those circumstances that contribute to children’s deaths; and the recommending of changes in policy, practices, and law to prevent children’s deaths.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 1; 1995, ch. 116, § 6.

Collateral References.

Criminal liability for excessive or improper punishment inflicted on child by parent, teacher or one in loco parentis, 89 A.L.R.2d 396.

Control, who has custody or control of child within terms of penal statute punishing cruelty or neglect by one having custody or control, 75 A.L.R.3d 933.

Expert testimony, admissibility of expert medical testimony on battered child syndrome, 98 A.L.R.3d 306.

Validity and construction of penal statute prohibiting child abuse, 1 A.L.R.4th 38.

Validity, construction, and application of state statute requiring doctor or other person to report child abuse, 73 A.L.R.4th 782.

Law Reviews.

Physicians and Surgeons — Infants — Physician’s Liability for Noncompliance with Child Abuse Reporting Statute, 52 N.D. L. Rev. 737 (1976).

Child Abuse and Neglect in North Dakota, William N. Friedrich and Jerry A. Boriskin, 53 N.D. L. Rev. 197 (1976).

Child Abuse: A Pervasive Problem of the 80s, 61 N.D. L. Rev. 193 (1985).

Summary of significant decisions rendered by the North Dakota Supreme Court in 1990 relating to child abuse, 66 N.D. L. Rev. 774 (1990).

50-25.1-02.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“A person responsible for the child’s welfare” means an individual who has responsibility for the care or supervision of a child and who is the child’s parent, an adult family member of the child, any member of the child’s household, the child’s guardian, or the child’s foster parent; or an employee of, or any person providing care for the child in, a child care setting. For the purpose of institutional child abuse or neglect, “A person responsible for the child’s welfare” means an institution that has responsibility for the care or supervision of a child.

“Abuse of alcohol”, “alcohol abuse”, or “abused alcohol” means alcohol use disorder as defined in the current edition of the “Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders” published by the American psychiatric association or a maladaptive use of alcohol with negative medical, sociological, occupational, or familial effects.

“Abused child” means an individual under the age of eighteen years who is suffering from abuse as defined in section 14-09-22 caused by a person responsible for the child’s welfare, and includes a sexually abused child who is suffering from or was subjected to any act in violation of sections 12.1-20-01 through 12.1-20-07, sections 12.1-20-11 through 12.1-20-12.3, or chapter 12.1-27.2, by any individual, including a juvenile.

“Alternative response assessment” means a child protection response involving substance exposed newborns which is designed to:

Provide referral services to and monitor support services for a person responsible for the child’s welfare and the substance exposed newborn; and

Develop a plan of safe care for the substance exposed newborn.

“Authorized agent” means the human service zone, unless another entity is designated by the department.

“Child fatality review panel” means a multidisciplinary team consisting of a representative of the department and, if possible, a forensic pathologist, a physician, a representative of the state department of health injury prevention, a representative of the attorney general, a representative of the superintendent of public instruction, a representative of the department of corrections and rehabilitation, a peace officer licensed in the state, a mental health professional, a representative of emergency medical services, a medical services representative from a federally recognized Indian tribe in this state, one or more representatives of the lay community, and a designated tribal representative, as an ad hoc member, acting for each federally recognized Indian tribe in this state. A team member, at the time of selection and while serving on the panel, must be a staff member of the public or private agency the member represents or shall serve without remuneration. The child fatality review panel may not be composed of fewer than three individuals.

“Child in need of services” means a child who in any of the following instances is in need of treatment or rehabilitation:

Is habitually and without justification truant from school or absent from school without an authorized excuse for more than five days during a school year;

Is habitually disobedient of the reasonable and lawful commands of the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian including runaway and is ungovernable or who is willfully in a situation that is dangerous or injurious to the health, safety, or morals of the child or others;

Except for an offense committed by a minor who is fourteen years of age or older under subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03 or an equivalent local ordinance or resolution, has committed an offense applicable only to a child; or

Is under fourteen years of age and has purchased, possessed, smoked, or used tobacco, a tobacco-related product, an electronic smoking device, or an alternative nicotine product in violation of subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03. As used in this subdivision, "electronic smoking device" and "alternative nicotine product" have the same meaning as in section 12.1-31-03.

“Child protection assessment” means a factfinding process designed to provide information that enables a determination of whether a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child, including instances that may not identify a specific person responsible for the child’s welfare which is responsible for the abuse or neglect.

“Children’s advocacy center” means a full or associate member of the national children’s alliance which assists in the coordination of the investigation in response to allegations of child abuse by providing a dedicated child-friendly location at which to conduct forensic interviews, forensic medical examinations, and other appropriate services and which promotes a comprehensive multidisciplinary team response to allegations of child abuse. The team response may include forensic interviews, forensic medical examinations, mental health and related support services, advocacy, and case review.

“Citizen review committee” means a committee appointed by the department to review the department’s provision of child welfare services.

“Confirmed” means that upon completion of a child protection assessment, the department determines, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child, and the department confirms the identity of a specific person responsible for the child’s welfare which is responsible for the abuse or neglect.

“Confirmed with unknown subject” means that upon completion of a child protection assessment, the department determines, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child, but the evidence does not confirm the identity of a specific person responsible for the child’s welfare which is responsible for the abuse or neglect.

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Family services assessment” means a child protection services response to reports of suspected child abuse or neglect in which the child is determined to be at low risk and safety concerns for the child are not evident according to guidelines developed by the department.

“Impending danger” means a foreseeable state of danger in which a behavior, attitude, motive, emotion, or situation can be reasonably anticipated to have severe effects on a child according to criteria developed by the department.

“Indicated” means that upon completion of an assessment of a report of institutional child abuse or neglect, the department determines based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child.

“Institutional child abuse or neglect” means situations of known or suspected child abuse or neglect when the institution responsible for the child’s welfare is a public or private school, a residential facility or setting either licensed, certified, or approved by the department, or a residential facility or setting that receives funding from the department. For purposes of this subsection, residential facilities and settings excludes correctional, medical, home and community-based residential rehabilitation, and educational boarding care settings.

“Near death” means an act that, as certified by a physician, places a child in serious or critical condition.

“Neglected child” means a child who, due to the action or inaction of a person responsible for the child’s welfare:

Is without proper care or control, subsistence, education as required by law, or other care or control necessary for the child’s physical, mental, or emotional health, or morals, and is not due primarily to the lack of financial means of a person responsible for the child’s welfare;

Has been placed for care or adoption in violation of law;

Has been abandoned;

Is without proper care, control, or education as required by law, or other care and control necessary for the child’s well-being because of the physical, mental, emotional, or other illness or disability of a person responsible for the child’s welfare, and that such lack of care is not due to a willful act of commission or act of omission, and care is requested by a person responsible for the child’s welfare;

Is in need of treatment and a person responsible for the child’s welfare has refused to participate in treatment as ordered by the juvenile court;

Was subject to prenatal exposure to chronic or severe use of alcohol or any controlled substance as defined in section 19-03.1-01 in a manner not lawfully prescribed by a practitioner;

Is present in an environment subjecting the child to exposure of a controlled substance, chemical substance, or drug paraphernalia as prohibited by section 19-03.1-22.2, except as used in this subsection, controlled substance includes any amount of marijuana; or

Is a victim of human trafficking as defined in title 12.1.

“Prenatal exposure to a controlled substance” means use of a controlled substance as defined in chapter 19-03.1 by a pregnant woman for a nonmedical purpose during pregnancy as evidenced by withdrawal symptoms in the child at birth, results of a toxicology test performed on the mother at delivery or the child at birth, or medical effects or developmental delays during the child’s first year of life that medically indicate prenatal exposure to a controlled substance.

“Protective services” includes services performed after an assessment of a report of child abuse or neglect has been conducted, such as social assessment, service planning, implementation of service plans, treatment services, referral services, coordination with referral sources, progress assessment, monitoring service delivery, and direct services.

“State child protection team” means a multidisciplinary team consisting of a representative of the department and, where possible, a representative of the state department of health, a representative of the attorney general, a representative of law enforcement, a representative of the superintendent of public instruction, a parent with lived experience, one or more representatives of the lay community, and, as an ad hoc member, the designee of the chief executive official of any institution named in a report of institutional abuse or neglect. All team members, at the time of their selection and thereafter, must be staff members of the public or private agency they represent or shall serve without remuneration. An attorney member of the child protection team may not be appointed to represent the child or the parents at any subsequent court proceeding nor may the child protection team be composed of fewer than three individuals. A quorum of the state child protection team consists of a minimum of one member from the department and two other state child protection team members.

“Substance exposed newborn” means an infant younger than twenty-eight days of age at the time of the initial report of child abuse or neglect and who is identified as being affected by substance abuse or withdrawal symptoms or by a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder.

“Unable to determine” means insufficient evidence is available to enable a determination whether a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child.

“Unconfirmed” means that upon completion of a child protection assessment, the department has determined, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that a child does not meet the definition of an abused or neglected child.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 2; 1977, ch. 456, § 1; 1979, ch. 514, § 5; 1983, ch. 82, § 105; 1985, ch. 521, § 8; 1985, ch. 536, §§ 2, 4; 1985, ch. 537, § 2; 1987, ch. 570, § 33; 1987, ch. 583, § 1; 1987, ch. 584, § 1; 1989, ch. 585, § 1; 1991, ch. 592, § 27; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 472, § 1; 2003, ch. 106, § 4; 2003, ch. 431, § 1; 2005, ch. 418, § 14; 2005, ch. 434, § 1; 2007, ch. 431, § 1; 2009, ch. 434, § 1; 2011, ch. 207, § 23; 2013, ch. 383, § 1; 2015, ch. 127, § 5, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 343, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 108, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 256, § 6, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 245, § 39, § 39, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 377, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, §§ 467, 468, eff September 1, 2022.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 127, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 383, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 23 of chapter 207, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 434, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 431, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

Note.

Section 50-25.1-02 was amended 4 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 468 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; Section 1 of Chapter 377, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 2083; Section 39 of Chapter 245, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1035; and Section 467 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

Section 50-25.1-02 was amended 5 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 256, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1520; Section 1 of Chapter 416, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1108; Section 3 of Chapter 108, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2273; Section 124 of Chapter 391, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2124; and Section 8 of Chapter 406, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2245.

50-25.1-02.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“A person responsible for the child’s welfare” means an individual who has responsibility for the care or supervision of a child and who is the child’s parent, an adult family member of the child, any member of the child’s household, the child’s guardian, or the child’s foster parent; or an employee of, or any person providing care for the child in, a child care setting. For the purpose of institutional child abuse or neglect, “A person responsible for the child’s welfare” means an institution that has responsibility for the care or supervision of a child.

“Abuse of alcohol”, “alcohol abuse”, or “abused alcohol” means alcohol use disorder as defined in the current edition of the “Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders” published by the American psychiatric association or a maladaptive use of alcohol with negative medical, sociological, occupational, or familial effects.

“Abused child” means an individual under the age of eighteen years who is suffering from abuse as defined in section 14-09-22 caused by a person responsible for the child’s welfare, and includes a sexually abused child who is suffering from or was subjected to any act in violation of sections 12.1-20-01 through 12.1-20-07, sections 12.1-20-11 through 12.1-20-12.3, or chapter 12.1-27.2, by any individual, including a juvenile.

“Alternative response assessment” means a child protection response involving substance exposed newborns which is designed to:

Provide referral services to and monitor support services for a person responsible for the child’s welfare and the substance exposed newborn; and

Develop a plan of safe care for the substance exposed newborn.

“Authorized agent” means the human service zone, unless another entity is designated by the department.

“Child fatality review panel” means a multidisciplinary team consisting of a representative of the department and, if possible, a forensic pathologist, a physician, a representative of the department of health and human services injury prevention, a representative of the attorney general, a representative of the superintendent of public instruction, a representative of the department of corrections and rehabilitation, a peace officer licensed in the state, a mental health professional, a representative of emergency medical services, a medical services representative from a federally recognized Indian tribe in this state, one or more representatives of the lay community, and a designated tribal representative, as an ad hoc member, acting for each federally recognized Indian tribe in this state. A team member, at the time of selection and while serving on the panel, must be a staff member of the public or private agency the member represents or shall serve without remuneration. The child fatality review panel may not be composed of fewer than three individuals.

“Child in need of services” means a child who in any of the following instances is in need of treatment or rehabilitation:

Is habitually and without justification truant from school or absent from school without an authorized excuse for more than five days during a school year;

Is habitually disobedient of the reasonable and lawful commands of the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian including runaway and is ungovernable or who is willfully in a situation that is dangerous or injurious to the health, safety, or morals of the child or others;

Except for an offense committed by a minor who is fourteen years of age or older under subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03 or an equivalent local ordinance or resolution, has committed an offense applicable only to a child; or

Is under fourteen years of age and has purchased, possessed, smoked, or used tobacco, a tobacco-related product, an electronic smoking device, or an alternative nicotine product in violation of subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03. As used in this subdivision, “electronic smoking device” and “alternative nicotine product” have the same meaning as in section 12.1-31-03

“Child protection assessment” means a factfinding process designed to provide information that enables a determination of whether a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child, including instances that may not identify a specific person responsible for the child’s welfare which is responsible for the abuse or neglect.

“Children’s advocacy center” means a full or associate member of the national children’s alliance which assists in the coordination of the investigation in response to allegations of child abuse by providing a dedicated child-friendly location at which to conduct forensic interviews, forensic medical examinations, and other appropriate services and which promotes a comprehensive multidisciplinary team response to allegations of child abuse. The team response may include forensic interviews, forensic medical examinations, mental health and related support services, advocacy, and case review.

“Citizen review committee” means a committee appointed by the department to review the department’s provision of child welfare services.

“Confirmed” means that upon completion of a child protection assessment, the department determines, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child, and the department confirms the identity of a specific person responsible for the child’s welfare which is responsible for the abuse or neglect.

“Confirmed with unknown subject” means that upon completion of a child protection assessment, the department determines, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child, but the evidence does not confirm the identity of a specific person responsible for the child’s welfare which is responsible for the abuse or neglect.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Family services assessment” means a child protection services response to reports of suspected child abuse or neglect in which the child is determined to be at low risk and safety concerns for the child are not evident according to guidelines developed by the department.

“Impending danger” means a foreseeable state of danger in which a behavior, attitude, motive, emotion, or situation can be reasonably anticipated to have severe effects on a child according to criteria developed by the department.

“Indicated” means that upon completion of an assessment of a report of institutional child abuse or neglect, the department determines based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child.

“Institutional child abuse or neglect” means situations of known or suspected child abuse or neglect when the institution responsible for the child’s welfare is a public or private school, a residential facility or setting either licensed, certified, or approved by the department, or a residential facility or setting that receives funding from the department. For purposes of this subsection, residential facilities and settings excludes correctional, medical, home- and community-based residential rehabilitation, and educational boarding care settings.

“Near death” means an act that, as certified by a physician, places a child in serious or critical condition.

“Neglected child” means a child who, due to the action or inaction of a person responsible for the child’s welfare:

Is without proper care or control, subsistence, education as required by law, or other care or control necessary for the child’s physical, mental, or emotional health, or morals, and is not due primarily to the lack of financial means of a person responsible for the child’s welfare;

Has been placed for care or adoption in violation of law;

Has been abandoned;

Is without proper care, control, or education as required by law, or other care and control necessary for the child’s well-being because of the physical, mental, emotional, or other illness or disability of a person responsible for the child’s welfare, and that such lack of care is not due to a willful act of commission or act of omission, and care is requested by a person responsible for the child’s welfare;

Is in need of treatment and a person responsible for the child’s welfare has refused to participate in treatment as ordered by the juvenile court;

Was subject to prenatal exposure to chronic or severe use of alcohol or any controlled substance as defined in section 19-03.1-01 in a manner not lawfully prescribed by a practitioner;

Is present in an environment subjecting the child to exposure of a controlled substance, chemical substance, or drug paraphernalia as prohibited by section 19-03.1-22.2, except as used in this subsection, controlled substance includes any amount of marijuana; or

Is a victim of human trafficking as defined in title 12.1.

“Prenatal exposure to a controlled substance” means use of a controlled substance as defined in chapter 19-03.1 by a pregnant woman for a nonmedical purpose during pregnancy as evidenced by withdrawal symptoms in the child at birth, results of a toxicology test performed on the mother at delivery or the child at birth, or medical effects or developmental delays during the child’s first year of life that medically indicate prenatal exposure to a controlled substance.

“Protective services” includes services performed after an assessment of a report of child abuse or neglect has been conducted, such as social assessment, service planning, implementation of service plans, treatment services, referral services, coordination with referral sources, progress assessment, monitoring service delivery, and direct services.

“State child protection team” means a multidisciplinary team consisting of a representative of the department, a representative of the attorney general, a representative of law enforcement, a representative of the superintendent of public instruction, a parent with lived experience, one or more representatives of the lay community, and, as an ad hoc member, the designee of the chief executive official of any institution named in a report of institutional abuse or neglect. All team members, at the time of their selection and thereafter, must be staff members of the public or private agency they represent or shall serve without remuneration. An attorney member of the child protection team may not be appointed to represent the child or the parents at any subsequent court proceeding nor may the child protection team be composed of fewer than three individuals. A quorum of the state child protection team consists of a minimum of one member from the department and two other state child protection team members.

“Substance exposed newborn” means an infant younger than twenty-eight days of age at the time of the initial report of child abuse or neglect and who is identified as being affected by substance abuse or withdrawal symptoms or by a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder.

“Unable to determine” means insufficient evidence is available to enable a determination whether a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child.

“Unconfirmed” means that upon completion of a child protection assessment, the department has determined, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that a child does not meet the definition of an abused or neglected child.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 2; 1977, ch. 456, § 1; 1979, ch. 514, § 5; 1983, ch. 82, § 105; 1985, ch. 521, § 8; 1985, ch. 536, §§ 2, 4; 1985, ch. 537, § 2; 1987, ch. 570, § 33; 1987, ch. 583, § 1; 1987, ch. 584, § 1; 1989, ch. 585, § 1; 1991, ch. 592, § 27; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 472, § 1; 2003, ch. 106, § 4; 2003, ch. 431, § 1; 2005, ch. 418, § 14; 2005, ch. 434, § 1; 2007, ch. 431, § 1; 2009, ch. 434, § 1; 2011, ch. 207, § 23; 2013, ch. 383, § 1; 2015, ch. 127, § 5, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 343, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 108, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 256, § 6, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 245, § 39, § 39, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 377, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, §§ 467, 468, eff September 1, 2022.

50-25.1-03.
Persons required and permitted to report — To whom reported.

Any dentist; optometrist; dental hygienist; medical examiner or coroner; tier 1 mental health professional, tier 2 mental health professional, tier 3 mental health professional, or tier 4 mental health professional as defined under section 25-01-01; or any other medical or mental health professional, religious practitioner of the healing arts, schoolteacher or administrator, school counselor, child care worker, foster parent, police or law enforcement officer, juvenile court personnel, probation officer, division of juvenile services employee, licensed social worker, family service specialist, child care licensor, or member of the clergy having knowledge of or reasonable cause to suspect a child is abused or neglected, or has died as a result of abuse or neglect, shall report the circumstances to the department or authorized agent if the knowledge or suspicion is derived from information received by that individual in that individual’s official or professional capacity. A member of the clergy, however, is not required to report such circumstances if the knowledge or suspicion is derived from information received in the capacity of spiritual adviser.

Any person having reasonable cause to suspect a child is abused or neglected, or has died as a result of abuse or neglect, may report such circumstances to the department or authorized agent.

A person having knowledge of or reasonable cause to suspect a child is abused or neglected, based on images of sexual conduct by a child discovered on a workplace computer, shall report the circumstances to the department or authorized agent.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 3; 1979, ch. 514, § 6; 1987, ch. 570, § 34; 1987, ch. 583, § 2; 1989, ch. 585, § 2; 1991, ch. 511, § 4; 1995, ch. 116, § 7; 2007, ch. 431, § 2; 2011, ch. 369, § 1; 2011, ch. 370, § 2; 2017, ch. 97, § 29, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 416, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 369, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 370, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 431, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of state statute requiring doctor or other person to report child abuse, 73 A.L.R.4th 782.

Law Reviews.

Implied Waiver of Physician and Psychotherapist-Patient Privilege in North Dakota Medical Malpractice and Personal Injury Litigation, 83 N.D. L. Rev. 855 (2007).

50-25.1-03.1.
Photographs — X-rays — Medical tests.

Any individual or official required to report under this chapter may cause to be taken color photographs of the areas of trauma visible on a child who the individual or official has knowledge or reasonable cause to suspect is an abused or neglected child and, if indicated by medical consultation, cause to be performed imaging studies, laboratory tests, colposcopies, and other medical tests of the child without the consent of the child’s parents or guardian. All photographs and other visual images taken pursuant to this section must be taken by law enforcement officials, physicians, or medical facility professionals upon the request of any individual or official required to report under this chapter. Photographs and visual images, or copies of them, must be sent to the department or authorized agent at the time the initial report of child abuse or neglect is made or as soon thereafter as possible.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 514, § 4; 1987, ch. 570, § 35; 1987, ch. 583, § 3; 1989, ch. 585, § 3; 2003, ch. 106, § 5; 2007, ch. 431, § 3; 2017, ch. 345, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 377, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 431, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

50-25.1-04.
Method of reporting.

All persons mandated or permitted to report cases of known or suspected child abuse or neglect immediately shall cause oral or written reports to be made to the department or authorized agent. Oral reports must be followed by written reports within forty-eight hours if so requested by the department or authorized agent. A requested written report must include information specifically sought by the department or authorized agent if the reporter possesses or has reasonable access to that information. Reports involving known or suspected institutional child abuse or neglect must be made and received in the same manner as all other reports made under this chapter.

The chief administrator of an entity employing more than twenty-five individuals who are required to report suspected child abuse or neglect under this chapter may designate an agent within the entity to file reports of suspected child abuse or neglect on behalf of the staff members and volunteers of the entity. Under no circumstances may a designated agent to whom such report has been made impose conditions, including prior approval or prior notification, upon a staff member or volunteer reporting suspected child abuse or neglect under this chapter or exercise any control, restraint, or modification, or make any changes to the information provided by the staff member or volunteer. A report filed by the designated agent must include the first and last name, title, and contact information for every staff member or volunteer of the entity who is believed to have direct knowledge of the facts surrounding the report. A single report from the designated agent under this subsection is adequate to meet the reporting requirement on behalf of staff members and volunteers of the entity listed with the required information.

If a staff member or volunteer makes a report of suspected child abuse and neglect to a designated agent of an entity as authorized in subsection 2, and the designated agent files a report on behalf of the staff member or volunteer, the staff member or volunteer will be considered to be fully compliant with the reporting requirements in this chapter. However, this section does not preclude the staff member or volunteer from also reporting the suspected child abuse and neglect directly to the department or authorized agent. A staff member or volunteer reporting suspected child abuse or neglect under this subsection who has knowledge the designated agent has failed to report on behalf of the staff member or volunteer immediately shall make a report directly to the department or authorized agent.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 4; 1979, ch. 514, § 7; 1987, ch. 570, § 36; 1987, ch. 583, § 4; 1989, ch. 585, § 4; 2021, ch. 377, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-04.1.
State child protection team — How created — Duties.

The department shall name the members of the state child protection team. The department is responsible for all reports made pursuant to this chapter. The department shall set meetings for the purposes of fulfilling the duties set forth in sections 50-25.1-02 and 50-25.1-04.

Under procedures adopted by the team, the team may meet at any time, confer with any individuals, groups, and agencies, and may issue reports or recommendations on any aspect of child abuse, neglect, or death resulting from abuse or neglect the team deems appropriate. All reports or recommendations issued are subject to section 50-25.1-11, except that the team shall make available information reflecting the disposition of reports of institutional child abuse, neglect, or death resulting from abuse or neglect, when the identity of persons reporting, and of the children and parents of children involved, is protected.

In every case of alleged institutional child abuse or neglect, the state child protection team shall make a determination whether child abuse or neglect is indicated. Upon a determination that institutional child abuse or neglect is indicated, the state child protection team promptly shall make a written report of the determination. When a report includes an allegation or report of institutional child abuse and neglect as defined in section 50-25.1-02, the state child protection team promptly shall notify the executive director of the department of the determination. Notwithstanding section 50-25.1-11, the department shall notify the superintendent of public instruction, the school district administrator, and the president or chairman of the school board or a private school’s governing body or entity if the subject of the report is a public or private school.

If a determination that institutional child abuse or neglect is indicated relative to a residential facility or setting either licensed, certified, or approved by the department or a residential facility or setting that receives funding from the department, that facility or setting shall engage in an improvement plan approved by the department. Failure to complete the approved improvement plan must result in notification to the residential facility or setting’s board of directors and to any entity that accredits the facility or setting. Notification must include the written report of the state child protection team, the approved improvement plan, and areas of deficiency that resulted in the notification.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 514, § 1; 1985, ch. 536, § 5; 1987, ch. 570, § 37; 1987, ch. 583, § 5; 1995, ch. 116, § 8; 1995, ch. 472, § 2; 2021, ch. 377, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Tort liability of public authority for failure to remove parentally abused or neglected children from parents’ custody, 60 A.L.R.4th 942.

50-25.1-04.2.
Child fatality review panel. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The child fatality review panel is a multidisciplinary panel and incorporates representatives of agencies that are directly or indirectly involved in responding to the death of a child. The department may designate any other person as appropriate to assist the panel in the performance of the panel’s duties. The department, in coordination with the state department of health, shall adopt rules for the operation of the panel. Panel members are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement of expenses for service on the panel. The representative of the department shall serve as presiding officer and is responsible for gathering records and preparing reports to review. The presiding officer shall set meetings for the purpose of fulfilling the duties set forth in sections 50-25.1-04.3 and 50-25.1-04.5.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 116, § 9; 2021, ch. 377, § 6, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 469, effective September 1, 2022.

Note.

Section 50-25.1-04.2 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 377, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 2083; and Section 469 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

50-25.1-04.2.
Child fatality review panel. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The child fatality review panel is a multidisciplinary panel and incorporates representatives of agencies that are directly or indirectly involved in responding to the death of a child. The department may designate any other person as appropriate to assist the panel in the performance of the panel's duties. The department shall adopt rules for the operation of the panel. Panel members are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement of expenses for service on the panel. The representative of the department shall serve as presiding officer and is responsible for gathering records and preparing reports to review. The presiding officer shall set meetings for the purpose of fulfilling the duties set forth in sections 50-25.1-04.3 and 50-25.1-04.5.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 116, § 9; 2021, ch. 377, § 6, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 469, effective September 1, 2022.